cs: Režim interakce s robotickou hračkou: Plazení; Tanec; Létání; Společník jako domácí mazlíček; Kutálení / na kolečkách; STEM / programovatelný pohyb; Plavání; Na pásech; Transformace; Chůze; Jiné
fr: Mode d’interaction du jouet robotisé: Rampant; Dansant; Volant; Animal de compagnie; Roulant/à roues; STIM/mouvements programmables; Nageant; À chenilles; Transformable; Marchant; Autre
zh-CN: 机器人玩具交互模式: 爬行; 跳舞; 飞行; 宠物型伴侣; 滚动/轮式; STEM/可编程运动; 游泳; 履带式; 变形; 步行; 其他
ja: ロボット玩具とのインタラクションモード: 這い歩き; ダンス; 飛行; ペット型コンパニオン; ローリング / 車輪; STEM / プログラマブルムーブメント; 水泳; クローラー式; 変形; 歩行; その他
ko: 로봇 장난감 상호작용 모드: 기어가기; 춤추기; 비행; 반려 동물형; 구르기/바퀴형; STEM/프로그래밍 가능한 움직임; 수영; 무한궤도형; 변신; 걷기; 기타
ro-RO: Mod de interacțiune a jucăriei robotice: Târâre; Dans; Zbor; Animal de companie; Rostogolire/Pe roți; STEM/Mișcare programabilă; Înot; Pe șenile; Transformare; Mers; Altele
de: Interaktionsmodus von Roboterspielzeug: Krabbeln; Tanzen; Fliegen; Haustierähnlicher Gefährte; Rollend/Auf Rädern; MINT/Programmierbare Bewegung; Schwimmen; Auf Raupen; Verwandelnd; Laufen; Sonstige
ru: Режим взаимодействия роботизированной игрушки: Ползание; Танцы; Полет; Имитация питомца; Катание/на колесах; STEM/программируемое движение; Плавание; На гусеничном ходу; Трансформация; Ходьба; Другое
es: Modo de interacción del juguete robótico: Gateo; Baile; Vuelo; Compañero tipo mascota; Rodante/con ruedas; Movimiento STEM/programable; Nado; Con orugas; Transformación; Caminata; Otro
pt-PT: Modo de interação do brinquedo robótico: Rastejar; Dançar; Voar; Companhia tipo animal de estimação; Rolante/com rodas; STEM/movimento programável; Nadar; Com lagartas; Transformação; Andar; Outro
bg-BG: Режим на взаимодействие на роботизирана играчка: Пълзящ; Танцуващ; Летящ; Домашен любимец компаньон; Търкалящ се/на колела; STEM/програмируемо движение; Плуващ; С вериги; Трансформиращ се; Ходещ; Други
it: Modi di interazione con il giocattolo robotico: Gattona; Balla; Vola; Animale da compagnia; A rotelle/ruote; STEM/Movimento programmabile; Nuota; Cingolato; Trasformabile; Cammina; Altro
nl: Robotisch speelgoed interactiemodus: Kruipend; Dansend; Vliegend; Huisdierachtige metgezel; Rollend/op wielen; STEM/programmeerbare beweging; Zwemmend; Rupsbanden; Transformerend; Lopend; Overige
hr-HR: Način interakcije s robotskom igračkom: Puzanje; Plesanje; Letenje; Ponašanje kućnog ljubimca; Kotrljanje / na kotače; STEM / programirano kretanje; Plivanje; S gusjenicama; Transformiranje; Hodanje; Ostalo
el: Τρόπος αλληλεπίδρασης του ρομποτικού παιχνιδιού: Έρπουσα κίνηση; Χορός; Πτήση; Συντροφιά τύπου κατοικίδιου; Κύλιση/Με τροχούς; STEM/Προγραμματιζόμενη κίνηση; Κολύμβηση; Με ερπύστριες; Μεταμόρφωση; Βάδισμα; Άλλο
da: Robotlegetøjs interaktionstilstand: Kravlende; Dansende; Flyvende; Kæledyrslignende ledsager; Rullende/på hjul; STEM/programmerbar bevægelse; Svømmende; Med bælter; Transformerende; Gående; Andet
nb: Samhandlingsmodus for robotleke: Krypende; Dansende; Flygende; Kjæledyrlignende ledsager; Rullende/hjulbasert; Realfag/programmerbar bevegelse; Svømmende; Beltegående; Transformerende; Gående; Annet
sv: Robotleksak – Interaktionssätt: Krypande; Dansande; Flygande; Husdjursliknande sällskap; Rullande/hjulburen; STEM/programmerbar rörelse; Simmande; Banddriven; Transformerande; Gående; Övrigt
lt-LT: Robotinio žaislo sąveikos režimas: Ropojimas; Šokis; Skraidymas; Į augintinį panašus kompanionas; Riedantis / su ratais; STEM / programuojamas judėjimas; Plaukimas; Su vikšrais; Transformuojamas; Vaikščiojimas; Kita
pt-BR: Brinquedo robótico modo de interação: Rastejar; Dançar; Voar; Companhia tipo pet; Rolante/Com rodas; Movimento programável/STEM; Nadar; Com esteiras; Transformação; Andar; Outro
sk-SK: Režim interakcie robotickej hračky: Plazenie; Tanec; Lietanie; Spoločník (ako zvieratko); Kotúľanie/na kolesách; STEM/programovateľný pohyb; Plávanie; Pásové; Transformácia; Chôdza; Iné
sl-SI: Način interakcije robotske igrače: Plazenje; Ples; Letenje; Kot hišni ljubljenček; Kotaljenje / na kolesih; STEM / programabilno gibanje; Plavanje; Na gosenicah; Transformiranje; Hoja; Drugo
hu: Robotjáték interakciós módja: Kúszó; Táncoló; Repülő; Kisállatszerű társ; Guruló / kerekes; STEM / programozható mozgás; Úszó; Lánctalpas; Átalakuló; Sétáló; Egyéb
th: Modeการโต้ตอบของเล่นหุ่นยนต์: คลาน; เต้นรำ; บิน; สัตว์เลี้ยงเสมือนจริง; กลิ้ง/มีล้อ; เคลื่อนไหวตามโปรแกรม/STEM; ว่ายน้ำ; มีสายพาน; แปลงร่าง; เดิน; อื่นๆ
tr: Robot oyuncak etkileşim modu: Emekleme; Dans etme; Uçma; Evcil hayvan benzeri arkadaş; Yuvarlanma/tekerlekli; STEM/programlanabilir hareket; Yüzme; Paletli; Dönüşen; Yürüme; Diğer
zh-TW: 機器人玩具互動模式: 爬行; 跳舞; 飛行; 寵物型伴侶; 滾動/輪式; STEM/可程式化動作; 游泳; 履帶式; 變形; 步行; 其他
vi: Chế độ tương tác đồ chơi robot: Bò; Nhảy múa; Bay; Thú cưng đồng hành; Lăn/Có bánh xe; STEM/Chuyển động có thể lập trình; Bơi; Bánh xích; Biến hình; Đi bộ; Khác
pl: Tryb interakcji zabawki robotycznej: Pełzanie; Taniec; Latanie; Towarzysz (jak zwierzątko domowe); Toczenie się / na kołach; STEM / programowalny ruch; Pływanie; Gąsienicowy; Transformacja; Chodzenie; Inny
fi: Robottilelujen vuorovaikutustila: Ryömivä; Tanssiva; Lentävä; Lemmikkimäinen kumppani; Pyörivä/pyörällinen; STEM / ohjelmoitava liike; Uiva; Telaketjullinen; Muuntuva; Kävelevä; Muu
en: Robotic toy interaction mode: Crawling; Dancing; Flying; Pet-like companion; Rolling/Wheeled; STEM/Programmable movement; Swimming; Tracked; Transforming; Walking; Other